North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-43.2 Special Fuels and Importer for Use Taxes

57-43.2-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural purpose” means the science, art, and business of farming. It includes raising crops, ranching, beekeeping, tree nurseries, agricultural units of colleges and universities, custom combining, manure spreading, and stack moving operations. Fuel used for an agricultural purpose includes fuel used in a vehicle, engine, or machine, movable or immovable, operated in whole or in part by internal combustion. It does not include fuel used to operate a licensed motor vehicle.

“Biodiesel, designated B100” means a fuel comprised of mono-alkyl esters of long chain fatty acids derived from vegetable oil or animal fats that meets American society for testing materials specification D 6751.

“Commissioner” means the state tax commissioner.

“Common carrier” or “contract carrier” means a person involved in the movement of special fuel from a terminal or movement of special fuel imported into this state, who is not an owner of the special fuel.

“Consumer” means a user of special fuel, including any person purchasing special fuel in this state for use in a licensed motor vehicle; any person importing special fuel into this state or purchasing special fuel in this state for use as heating fuel or for an agricultural, industrial, or railroad purpose; or any person purchasing special fuel in this state for use in recreational or any other types of motor vehicles. It does not include a person importing or purchasing special fuel for resale.

“Destination state” means any state, territory, foreign country, or sovereign nation to which special fuel is directed for delivery into a storage facility, receptacle, container, or any other type of transportation equipment, for the purposes of resale or use.

“Director” means the director of the department of transportation.

“Distributor” means a person, other than a retailer, who acquires special fuel from a refiner or supplier for subsequent wholesale distribution in bulk or transport load by truck, railcar, or in a barrel, drum, or other receptacle.

“Dyed special fuel” means special fuel to which an indelible dye meeting United States environmental protection agency and internal revenue service regulations has been added before or upon withdrawal at a terminal or refinery rack.

“Export” means the delivery of special fuel across the boundaries of this state from a place of origin in this state by or for a refiner, supplier, or distributor.

“Exporter” means a refiner, supplier, or distributor who exports special fuel out of this state in bulk or transport load by truck, railcar, or in a barrel, drum, or other receptacle.

“Gallon” means a United States gallon [3.79 liters] measured on a gross volume basis.

“Green diesel” means a fuel produced from nonfossil renewable resources, including agricultural or silvicultural plants, animal fats, residue, and waste generated from the production, processing, and marketing of agricultural products, silvicultural products, and other renewable resources, which meets applicable American society for testing and materials specifications.

“Gross volume” means measurement in United States gallons [liters] without temperature or barometric adjustments.

“Heating fuel use” means use of special fuel to heat homes, private and public office buildings, or private and public commercial buildings or use of special fuel in stoves or burners or for any other heating purposes.

“Highway purpose” means any use of special fuel in any motor vehicle in any phase of construction, reconstruction, repair, or maintenance of public roads or highways, but does not include that special fuel used for heating of oils, gravel, bituminous mixture, or in any equipment used in the preparation of any materials to be used on any type of road or highway surfacing.

“Import” means the delivery of special fuel across the boundaries of this state from a place of origin outside this state by a refiner, supplier, distributor, or consumer.

“Importer” means a refiner, supplier, distributor, or consumer who imports special fuel into this state in bulk or transport load by truck, railcar, or in a barrel, drum, or other receptacle.

“Industrial purpose” means:

A manufacturing, warehousing, or loading dock operation;

Construction;

Sand and gravel processing;

Well drilling, well testing, or well servicing;

Maintenance of business premises, golf courses, or cemeteries;

A commercial or contract painting operation;

Electrical services;

A refrigeration unit on a truck;

A power-take-off unit; and

Other similar business activity.

“Interstate motor carrier” means any person importing special fuel into this state in the fuel supply tank or tanks of any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles used, designed, or maintained for transportation of persons or property; and having two axles and a gross weight exceeding twenty-six thousand pounds [1179.3401 kilograms]; or having three or more axles regardless of weight; or is used in combination when the weight of such combination exceeds twenty-six thousand pounds [1179.3401 kilograms] gross vehicle weight. In the case of motor vehicles that are leased or rented, the interstate motor carrier means the lessee or renter unless the director has designated the lessor, renter, or some other person as the interstate motor carrier.

“Licensed motor vehicle” means any motor vehicle required to be licensed for operation upon public roads or highways, but does not include a vehicle with a permanently mounted manure spreader or stack moving unit.

“Motor vehicle” means a vehicle, engine, or machine, movable or immovable, operated in whole or in part by internal combustion using one or more of the special fuels defined in this chapter but does not include aircraft.

“Person” means every individual, partnership, firm, association, joint venture, corporation, limited liability company, estate, business trust, receiver, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

“Physical inventory reading” means a measurement of special fuel available for distribution in a terminal, an underground storage tank, an aboveground storage tank, or in a tank wagon, bulk delivery vehicle, railcar, barrel, drum, or other receptacle.

“Position holder” means a person holding an inventory position of special fuel in a terminal as reflected on the records of the terminal operator, a person holding the inventory position when that person has a contractual agreement with the terminal operator for the use of storage facilities or terminaling services at a terminal, and a terminal operator who owns special fuel in a terminal.

“Public road or highway” means every way or place generally open to the use of the public as a matter of right, for the purpose of motor vehicle travel, notwithstanding that it may be temporarily closed or subject to restricted travel due to construction, reconstruction, repair, or maintenance.

“Rack” means a mechanism used to dispense special fuel from a terminal.

“Railroad purpose” means the operation of railroad locomotives and the construction, reconstruction, repair, and maintenance of railroads. Fuel used for a railroad purpose includes fuel used to operate a railroad locomotive, and fuel used in a motor vehicle for purposes of construction, reconstruction, repair, and maintenance of railroads. It does not include fuel used in a licensed motor vehicle.

“Refiner” means a person who produces, manufactures, or refines special fuels in this state.

“Retail location” means a site at which special fuel is dispensed through a pump from an underground or aboveground storage unit into the supply tank of a motor vehicle.

“Retailer” means a person who acquires special fuel from a supplier or distributor for resale to a consumer at a retail location.

“Sale” means, with respect to special fuel, the transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means, for a consideration.

“Special fuel” means all combustible gases and liquids suitable for the generation of power for propulsion of motor vehicles and includes compressed natural gas, kerosene, liquefied petroleum gases, all gases and liquids which meet the specifications as determined by the department of environmental quality under chapter 23.1-13, as well as all liquids determined by the department of environmental quality to be heating oil under chapter 23.1-13, except it does not include either motor vehicle fuels as defined in section 57-43.1-01, aviation fuels as defined in section 57-43.3-01, or antifreeze as defined by section 23.1-14-02.

“Supplier” means a refiner who distributes special fuel from a terminal in this state, or a person who acquires special fuel by pipeline from a state, territory, or possession of the United States or from a foreign country, for storage at and distribution from a terminal, or a person who acquires special fuel by truck or railcar for storage at and distribution from a terminal in this state.

“Taxpayer” means a refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, exporter, terminal operator, or retailer.

“Terminal” means a special fuel storage and distribution facility that is supplied by a refinery or pipeline and from which the special fuel may be removed from the rack.

“Terminal operator” means a person who by ownership or contractual agreement is charged with the responsibility for, or physical control over, and operation of a terminal. If a terminal is owned by coventurers, “terminal operator” means the person appointed to exercise the responsibility for, or physical control over, and operation of the terminal.

“Wholesale distribution” means the sale of special fuel by a supplier or distributor.

Fuel used for an industrial purpose includes fuel used in a vehicle, engine, or machine, movable or immovable, operated in whole or in part by internal combustion. It does not include heating fuel, fuel used for an agricultural purpose, fuel used for a railroad purpose, or fuel used to operate a licensed motor vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1985, ch. 647, § 3; 1985, ch. 648, § 1; 1987, ch. 721, § 5; 1987, ch. 722, § 3; 1989, ch. 72, § 23; 1989, ch. 727, § 9; 1991, ch. 688, § 7; 1993, ch. 54, §§ 101, 106; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 498, § 11; 1999, ch. 526, § 31; 1999, ch. 528, § 3; 2001, ch. 548, § 2; 2003, ch. 531, § 3; 2005, ch. 94, § 6; 2007, ch. 536, § 2; 2009, ch. 559, § 7; 2011, ch. 460, § 14; 2017, ch. 199, § 60, effective April 29, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 531, S.L. 2003 is effective on the first day of the first month after the tax commissioner certifies to the governor and the office of the legislative council that a refining facility is operational in this state which has a production capacity of at least ten million gallons [37854000 liters] of biodiesel per year, pursuant to section 6 of chapter 531, S.L. 2003.

The 2001 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 548, S.L. 2001 becomes effective on the first day of the first month after the tax commissioner certifies to the governor and the office of the legislative council that a refining facility is operational in this state which has a production capacity of at least ten million gallons [37854000 liters] of biodiesel per year, pursuant to section 5 of chapter 548, S.L. 2001.

Note.

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under
S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

This section is set out above to reflect that the contingency of the section has been met.

57-43.2-02.
Tax imposed.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an excise tax of twenty-three cents per gallon [3.79 liters] is imposed on the sale or delivery of all special fuel sold or used in this state. For the purpose of determining the tax upon compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas under this section, one hundred twenty cubic feet [3.40 cubic meters] of compressed natural gas, and one and seven-tenths gallons [6.44 liters] of liquefied natural gas is equal to one gallon [3.79 liters] of other special fuel.

A refiner, supplier, distributor, or retailer shall remit the tax imposed by this section on special fuel used and on direct sales of special fuel to a customer.

The tax imposed by this section does not apply on sales by a supplier to another supplier, on a sale by a supplier to a distributor, on a sale by a distributor to another distributor, on a sale by a distributor to a retailer, on an export, or on a sale to an exempt consumer.

The person required to remit the tax imposed by this section shall pass the tax on to the customer.

The person required to remit the tax imposed by this section shall pay the tax to the commissioner by the twenty-fifth day of the calendar month after the month during which the special fuel was sold or used by the person. When the twenty-fifth day of the calendar month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the due date is the first working day after the Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. When payment is made by mail, the payment is timely if the envelope containing the payment is postmarked by the United States postal service or other postal carrier service before midnight of the due date.

The commissioner shall pay over all of the money received during each calendar month to the state treasurer.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1983, ch. 658, § 1; 1983, ch. 664, § 2; 1985, ch. 648, § 2; 1987, ch. 687, § 10; 1989, ch. 723, § 3, R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; S.L. 1989, ch. 727, § 10; 1991, ch. 404, § 4; 1997, ch. 498, § 12; 1997, ch. 499, § 2; 1999, ch. 336, § 3; 1999, ch. 526, § 32; 1999, ch. 527, § 2; 2001, ch. 548, § 3; 2003, ch. 531, § 4; 2005, ch. 40, § 14; 2005, ch. 94, §
6; 2009, ch. 559, §
8; 2015, ch. 432, § 11, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 531, S.L. 2003 is effective on the first day of the first month after the tax commissioner certifies to the governor and the office of the legislative council that a refining facility is operational in this state which has a production capacity of at least ten million gallons [37854000 liters] of biodiesel per year, pursuant to section 6 of chapter 531, S.L. 2003.

The 2001 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 548, S.L. 2001 becomes effective on the first day of the first month after the tax commissioner certifies to the governor and the office of the legislative council that a refining facility is operational in this state which has a production capacity of at least ten million gallons [37854000 liters] of biodiesel per year, pursuant to section 5 of chapter 548, S.L. 2001.

57-43.2-02.1.
Additional special fuel tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 499, § 3.

57-43.2-02.2.
Refund of tax for fuel used for heating and for an agricultural, industrial, or railroad purpose. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 528, § 7.

57-43.2-02.3.
Exemptions. [Contingent expiration date — See note]

Special fuel commonly known as diesel fuel which is dyed for federal fuel tax exemption purposes and sold for an agricultural, industrial, or railroad purpose is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02 at the time the fuel is sold to the consumer and is subject instead to the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-03. Special fuel known as diesel fuel which is dyed for federal fuel tax exemption purposes and sold for use as heating fuel is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by sections 57-43.2-02 and 57-43.2-03. Fuel purchased for use in a licensed motor vehicle is not exempt from the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02.

Special fuel, other than diesel fuel, sold for an agricultural, industrial, or railroad purpose is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02 at the time the fuel is sold to the consumer and is subject instead to the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-03. Propane sold for use as heating fuel is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by sections 57-43.2-02 and 57-43.2-03 at the time the fuel is sold to the consumer. Special fuel, other than diesel fuel and propane, sold for use as heating fuel is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by sections 57-43.2-02 and 57-43.2-03 at the time the fuel is sold to the consumer. Fuel purchased for use in a licensed motor vehicle is not exempt from the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02.

A consumer purchasing special fuel for a use in which it becomes an ingredient or a component part of tangible personal property intended to be sold ultimately at retail is exempt from the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02 and is not subject to the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-03.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 498, § 14; 2007, ch. 529, § 6; 2011, ch. 54, § 10; 2013, ch. 459, § 5.

Note.

Section 6 of chapter 459, S.L. 2013 provides: “

EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 2 and 3 of this Act are effective for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2013. Sections 1, 4, and 5 of this Act are effective upon receipt of certification by the tax commissioner from the plant owner that construction of the gas liquefaction plant eligible for the exemptions under sections 2 and 3 of this Act is complete.”

57-43.2-02.3.
Exemptions. [Contingent effective date — See note]

Special fuel commonly known as diesel fuel which is dyed for federal fuel tax exemption purposes and sold for an agricultural, industrial, or railroad purpose is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02 at the time the fuel is sold to the consumer and is subject instead to the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-03. Special fuel known as diesel fuel which is dyed for federal fuel tax exemption purposes and sold for use as heating fuel is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by sections 57-43.2-02 and 57-43.2-03. Fuel purchased for use in a licensed motor vehicle is not exempt from the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02.

Special fuel, other than diesel fuel, sold for an agricultural, industrial, or railroad purpose is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02 at the time the fuel is sold to the consumer and is subject instead to the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-03. Propane sold for use as heating fuel is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by sections 57-43.2-02 and 57-43.2-03 at the time the fuel is sold to the consumer. Special fuel, other than diesel fuel and propane, sold for use as heating fuel is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by sections 57-43.2-02 and 57-43.2-03 at the time the fuel is sold to the consumer. Fuel purchased for use in a licensed motor vehicle is not exempt from the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02.

A consumer purchasing special fuel for a use in which it becomes an ingredient or a component part of tangible personal property intended to be sold ultimately at retail is exempt from the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02 and is not subject to the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-03.

Liquefied natural gas sold or used for an agricultural, industrial, or railroad purpose is exempt from the special fuel tax imposed by sections 57-43.2-02 and 57-43.2-03.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 498, § 14; 2007, ch. 529, § 6; 2011, ch. 54, § 10; 2013, ch. 459, § 5.

57-43.2-02.4.
Special fuels tax exemption for hydrogen. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2005, ch. 575, § 3.

57-43.2-03.
Special excise tax levied.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a special excise tax of two percent is imposed on all sales of propane and a tax of four cents per gallon is imposed on all sales of diesel fuel and other special fuels, which are exempted from the tax imposed under section 57-43.2-02.

A consumer importing special fuel into this state, for a purpose for which the special fuel is taxable under this section, is liable for the tax. The commissioner shall collect the tax from the consumer importing the fuel.

If any fuel subject to tax by this section was subject to tax in any other state or its political subdivisions, the tax in this section applies but at a rate measured by the difference between the rate imposed in this section and the rate imposed by the other state or its political subdivisions. If the tax imposed by the other state or its political subdivisions is the same or greater than the tax imposed by this section, no tax is due.

An invoice, sales ticket, or other sales document issued or created covering a sale taxable under this section must identify the consumer to whom the sale was made, specify the purpose for which the special fuel was sold, and specify whether the fuel was dyed for tax exemption purposes.

The tax imposed by this section does not apply on a sale by a supplier to another supplier, a sale by a supplier to a distributor, a sale by a distributor to another distributor, a sale by a distributor to a retailer, an export, or a sale to an exempt consumer.

The person required to remit the tax imposed by this section shall pass the tax on to the consumer.

The person required to remit the tax imposed by this section shall pay the tax to the commissioner by the twenty-fifth day of the calendar month after the month during which the special fuel was sold or used by the person. When the twenty-fifth day of the calendar month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the due date is the first working day after the Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. When payment is made by mail, the payment is timely if the envelope containing the payment is postmarked by the United States postal service or other postal carrier service before midnight of the due date.

The commissioner shall pay over all of the money received during each calendar month to the state treasurer.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 687, § 11; 1989, ch. 729, § 1; 1991, ch. 688, § 8; 1997, ch. 498, § 15; 1999, ch. 526, § 34; 1999, ch. 528, § 4; 2001, ch. 548, § 4; 2003, ch. 531, § 5; 2005, ch. 94, § 6; 2007, ch. 540, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 531, S.L. 2003 is effective on the first day of the first month after the tax commissioner certifies to the governor and the office of the legislative council that a refining facility is operational in this state which has a production capacity of at least ten million gallons [37854000 liters] of biodiesel per year, pursuant to section 6 of chapter 531, S.L. 2003.

The 2001 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 548, S.L. 2001 becomes effective on the first day of the first month after the tax commissioner certifies to the governor and the office of the legislative council that a refining facility is operational in this state which has a production capacity of at least ten million gallons [37854000 liters] of biodiesel per year, pursuant to section 5 of chapter 548, S.L. 2001.

57-43.2-03.1.
Dyed special fuel use by a city.

A city that has computerized fuel dispensing equipment that allows tracking of fuel usage by its vehicles shall report to the tax commissioner, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, the highway and nonhighway use of dyed special fuels dispensed through that equipment. The city shall pay taxes under this chapter appropriate for that usage.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 571, § 1.

57-43.2-04.
Tax chargeable to consumer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-04.1.
Tax collection allowance.

The person required to remit the tax imposed by this chapter shall deduct one percent from the amount of tax due, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars per month, to cover the cost of collecting the tax and remitting it to the commissioner. This provision does not apply to tax on excess inventory losses and does not apply to additional tax assessed during an audit.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 730, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 35.

57-43.2-04.2.
Refund to prevent taxation by multiple jurisdictions.

Any person to whom special fuel is sold on which the tax imposed by this chapter has been paid, who thereafter removes the fuel from this state for sale or resale in another state or to a state that requires payment of a tax upon the use of the fuel in that state, must be granted a refund of the tax that was paid pursuant to this chapter. The refund may be granted only upon application to the commissioner in the manner prescribed by the commissioner and must include proof that fuel for sale or resale in another state was reported to the taxing agency of that state, or in the case of a consumer, proof of payment of the tax imposed by the other state. A claim for refund under this section must be made within one year from the date the fuel was removed to another state for sale, resale, or use in another state.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 36; 2009, ch. 40, § 23.

57-43.2-04.3.
Refund of tax on tax-exempt sales.

When a person purchasing special fuel for resale purposes pays the tax imposed by this chapter and later makes a sale of the fuel to an agency of the United States government, the person may apply to the commissioner for a refund of the tax.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 37.

57-43.2-04.4.
Credit for taxes paid on worthless accounts and refunds.

Taxes paid on special fuels represented by accounts found to be worthless, and actually charged off for income tax purposes, may be taken as a credit against subsequent taxes due provided the accounts charged off included the cost of the fuel as well as the taxes due. If the worthless account is subsequently collected, the tax must be remitted on the amount collected. If in any case the credit or any part of it cannot be utilized because of a discontinuance of a business or for other valid reason, the amount may be refunded.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 38.

57-43.2-04.5.
Refund to emergency medical services operation.

Upon application to the commissioner, the operator of an emergency medical services operation licensed under chapter 23-27 is entitled to a refund of taxes paid under this chapter for special fuel purchased and used by the emergency medical services operation.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 537, § 2.

57-43.2-04.6.
Refund of tax for fuel used for a refrigeration unit on a truck.

A consumer who buys or uses any special fuel for a refrigeration unit that has a separate supply tank on a truck or trailer on which the special fuels tax imposed under section 57-43.2-02 has been paid may file a claim for a refund with the tax commissioner. The tax imposed under section 57-43.2-03 must be deducted from the refund.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 572, § 1.

57-43.2-05.
Refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, exporter, retailer, and terminal operator required to secure license — License fees.

A person may not engage in business in this state as a refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, exporter, retailer, or terminal operator of special fuel unless that person holds an unrevoked license issued by the commissioner. The commissioner may require a separate license for liquefied petroleum gases.

The person shall file an application for a license with the commissioner providing such information as required by the commissioner, and on a form or in a format as required by the commissioner. The information must include:

The name under which the person intends to transact business in this state.

The physical location of each place of business to be covered by the license and the mailing address of the location to which forms and correspondence are to be directed.

If a partnership, the name and address of each of the persons constituting the partnership.

If a domestic corporation, the corporate name, the date of incorporation, and the names and addresses of the directors and corporate officers.

If a foreign corporation, the corporate name, the state and the date of incorporation, the name and address of the resident agent, the location of each place of business, and the date on which the business was established.

If a domestic limited liability company, the limited liability company name, the date of formation, and the names and addresses of the governors and managers.

If a foreign limited liability company, the limited liability company name, the state and the date of formation, the name and address of the resident agent, the location of each place of business, and the date on which the business was established.

Any other information the commissioner may require.

An applicant for a single or multiple license as a refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, exporter, or terminal operator shall pay to the commissioner a license fee of twenty dollars. The license fee must be paid at the time the application is made.

Based on the information provided in a special fuels retailer’s license application and on the special fuels tax laws in effect at the time the application is filed, the tax commissioner may determine, on those conditions and terms as the commissioner deems reasonable and necessary, that a special fuels retailer license is not required:

If there is a subsequent change in the special fuels tax laws that would require the person to obtain a license, the tax commissioner shall notify the person of the change and that a license application must be submitted. The person shall submit an application within thirty days of the notice provided in this subdivision. If the application is not filed, the tax commissioner may take the action necessary to enforce the license requirements of this section.

If there is a subsequent change in the applicant’s business practices that may require the person to obtain a retail license, the person must submit a revised license application. The tax commissioner shall review the revised application and make a redetermination as to whether a special fuels license is required.

If the tax commissioner determines there was an omission or erroneous information provided in a license application and that a license would have been required under this section if correct and complete information had been provided, the tax commissioner shall assess tax, penalty, and interest from the date the license application was received. The tax must be assessed as provided in section 57-43.2-15 and must be based on the best information available. Subsection 4 of section 57-43.2-14 applies to the time period in which an assessment may be made under this subsection.

The application must be signed by the taxpayer to be valid and must contain a written declaration that it is made and subscribed under penalties of perjury. For an individual, partnership, or unincorporated association, the application must be signed by the owner. For a corporation, the application must be signed by an authorized officer. For a limited liability company, the application must be signed by an authorized manager.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 722, § 4; 1991, ch. 688, § 9; 1999, ch. 526, § 39; 2011, ch. 481, § 1.

57-43.2-06.
License, fee, and bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-07.
Bond or letter of credit required.

As a condition precedent to the issuance of a single or multiple license, a supplier, distributor, retailer, or importer shall furnish a surety bond, a cash bond, or an approved letter of credit as security to guarantee the payment of the special fuel taxes imposed by this chapter. A terminal operator or an exporter who is not also licensed as a supplier or distributor is exempt from this requirement.

The surety bond, cash bond, or letter of credit must be in an amount prescribed by the commissioner but not less than one thousand dollars. If the commissioner requires a separate license for liquefied petroleum gases, a separate security is required for that license, and the surety bond, cash bond, or letter of credit must be in an amount prescribed by the commissioner but not less than five hundred dollars.

The surety bond, cash bond, or letter of credit is subject to approval by the commissioner.

After a single or multiple license has been in effect for five or more years, the commissioner may review the person’s records and may waive the requirement for a security. The requirement for a security may be reinstated at the discretion of the commissioner.

A surety bond or letter of credit provided as security must be kept in the custody of the commissioner and may be used by the commissioner, without notice to the principal, if it becomes necessary to cover the special fuel tax, penalties, and interest due.

Money deposited with the commissioner as a cash bond must be made in the form of a cashier’s check or bank money order payable to the commissioner. The money received must be paid by the commissioner to the state treasurer and credited by the treasurer into a special fund to be known as the motor fuel tax security trust fund. The money deposited may be used by the commissioner, without notice to the depositor, if it becomes necessary to cover tax, penalties, and interest due. If the money deposited is used to cover unpaid liabilities, the commissioner shall certify the information to the director of the office of management and budget. The office of management and budget shall transmit the money to the commissioner who shall apply as much of the money deposited by the person as is necessary to satisfy the liabilities. When in the commissioner’s judgment it is no longer necessary to require the deposit to be maintained, the commissioner shall certify the information to the director of the office of management and budget who shall pay the unused money to the depositor.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 722, § 6; 1991, ch. 688, § 10; 1999, ch. 526, § 40.

57-43.2-07.1.
Qualification for exporter license.

As a condition precedent to the issuance of a license to an exporter, the exporter shall furnish proof that the exporter has a valid unrevoked license required by the jurisdiction of import.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 41.

57-43.2-07.2.
Qualification for importer license.

As a condition precedent to the issuance of a license to an importer, the importer shall furnish proof that the importer has a valid unrevoked license required by the jurisdiction of export. An importer must also qualify for and apply for a license in this state as a refiner, supplier, or distributor.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 42.

57-43.2-08.
Application for license — Issuance of license — Denial of license.

Upon receipt and approval of an application for a license, the license fee, and the required security, the commissioner shall issue a license which is valid until it is suspended, revoked for cause, or otherwise canceled. The license is not transferable.

A multiple license must be issued to a person who applies and qualifies for more than one type of license.

The commissioner may refuse to issue a license to a person who has not provided the required security, who failed to provide the information requested on the application, who previously held a license which was revoked by the commissioner, who is a subterfuge for the real party in interest who previously held a license that was revoked by the commissioner, or upon other sufficient cause being shown. The commissioner shall grant the person the right to a hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 28-32. Written notice of the hearing must be served on the person at least ten days prior to the date established for the hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 722, § 7; 1999, ch. 526, § 43.

57-43.2-09.
Revocation of license — Hearing to show cause — Reinstatement.

The commissioner may revoke a license for reasonable cause. Before revoking a license, the commissioner shall grant a hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 28-32 to allow the person to show cause why the license should not be revoked. Written notice of a hearing must be served on the person at least ten days prior to the date established for the hearing.

Before a new license may be issued to a person who is obligated to remit the tax imposed by this chapter and whose license was revoked, the person shall pay to the commissioner the amount of any delinquent tax, penalties, and interest remaining unpaid and must file with the commissioner a surety bond upon which the person is the principal. The bond must be in an amount determined by the commissioner but not less than one thousand dollars. The bond must be payable to the commissioner and be conditioned upon the timely filing of required tax reports and the timely payment of the full amount of the tax due as required under this chapter. If the person fails to file the required report or to timely pay the full amount of the tax due, the commissioner may require an increase in the amount of the surety bond conditioned to secure at all times the payment of any tax due to the state under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 722, § 8; 1999, ch. 526, § 44.

57-43.2-10.
Retention of records — Subject to inspection.

A refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, exporter, terminal operator, and retailer shall maintain and retain records of all special fuel refined, purchased, imported, or otherwise acquired; of all special fuel exported, sold, distributed, and used; and of all inventory records, for a period of not less than three years. Inventory records include physical readings, metered readings of sales, delivery tickets, and delivery readings. The records are open to inspection by the commissioner or by any agent or employee authorized by the commissioner during business hours.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 722, § 9; 1999, ch. 526, § 45.